Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-565
City supplies; equipment; described.

The list described in section 14-564 shall include any and all supplies or equipment for public improvements, street cleaning or repairs, or horses, hose, engines, vehicles, or implements used by the park board, fire department, or police department. A list of such supplies may be made and advertised for at any time upon request of the proper board or department, but subject to such section as to the bids and newspapers and advertisement for bids. Such list shall not include the books, documents, or other papers or material purchased by the library board.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 54, p. 494;

C.S.1922, § 3680;

C.S.1929, § 14-557;

R.S.1943, § 14-565;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 210.
July 21, 2022